Idaho statutes. Title 32 DOMESTIC RELATIONS
Part 4
Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 32-11-401. Application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, otherwise known as the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 32-11-402. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

§ 32-11-403. [Reserved.]

§ 32-11-405. Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before the effective date of this chapter as the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

§ 32-11-404. [Reserved.]